South Dakota, session 2026, HB1227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-5-188 be AMENDED:
32-5-188. In addition to the license fees paid pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter for a motor vehicle, the owner of an electric motor vehicle shall pay an annual fee
of one hundred dollars. The fee must be paid at the time of annual registration as
otherwise provided in this chapter. The license fee imposed by this section does not apply
to any motorcycle propelled by an electric motor, if the license fee is paid pursuant to
§ 32-5-9.
For the purposes of this section, "electric motor vehicle" means a noncommercial
motor vehicle for which the only source of propulsion is an electric motor that draws
electricity from a battery capable of being recharged from an external source of electricity,
and which may be legally operated on the interstate highways in this state and eligible for
registration pursuant to the laws of this state. The electric motor vehicle must have been
made by a manufacturer primarily for use on public streets, roads, and highways and must
meet National Highway Traffic Safety Administration standards provided in 49 C.F.R. § 571
(January 1, 2021).
The fees received pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state highway
fund.

26.680.11 2 1227
An Act to increase the annual fee required of an owner of an electric motor vehicle.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1227
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1227 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1227 ENROLLED